Utah statutes.
16-11-5.   Application of Utah Revised Business Corporation Act -- Conflicts.

The provisions of Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, shall be applicable to professional corporations, and they shall enjoy the powers and privileges and be subject to the duties, restrictions and liabilities of other corporations, except where inconsistent with this act. This act shall take precedence in the event of any conflict with provisions of Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act or other laws.

